Hawaii, session 2025, HB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 711-1106.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (4) to read as follows: "(4) Harassment by stalking is a [misdemeanor.] class C felony." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________